Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2422
Application for examination.

Any person desiring to take the examination for a nursing home administrator license may request to take the examination any time after receiving notification of registration as an administrator-in-training or a person in a mentoring program, but the license shall not be issued until the board receives documentation of completion of the administrator-in-training or mentoring program and completion of all licensure requirements.

Laws 1988, LB 693, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,1988, § 71-2041.06;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 86;

Laws 1999, LB 411, § 5;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-6058;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 837.